Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 32 COLORADO MINED LAND RECLAMATION ACT
34-32-117. Warranties of performance - warranties of financial responsibility - release of warranties - applicability.

No permit may be issued under this article until the board receives performance and financial warranties as described in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section.

A "performance warranty" shall consist of a written promise to the board, by the operator, to comply with all requirements of this article. Performance warranties shall be in such form as the board may prescribe. Whenever two or more persons or entities are named as operators in a single permit, the operators may limit the scope of their individual performance warranties so long as their warranties, in the aggregate, warrant performance of all requirements of this article.

A "financial warranty" shall consist of a written promise, to the board, to be responsible for reclamation costs up to the amount specified by the board pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, together with proof of financial responsibility. Financial warranties may be provided by the operator, by any third party, or by any combination of persons or entities and shall be in such form as the board may prescribe.

The board may accept interests in real and personal property as financial warranties to the extent of a specified percentage of the estimated value of any such property. Any person offering such financial warranty shall submit information necessary to show clear title to and the value of such property.

The board may refuse to accept any form of financial warranty if:

The value of the financial warranty offered is dependent upon the success, profitability, or continued operation of the mine; or

The board determines that the financial warranty offered cannot reasonably be converted to cash within one hundred eighty days of forfeiture.

For nondesignated mining operations:

This subsection (3) shall be applicable July 1, 1993, to deeds of trust which are used as collateral for new financial warranties completed on or after such date;

This subsection (3) shall be applicable on January 1, 1996, to:

Deeds of trust existing as of July 1, 1993, and subsequent updates of these same deeds of trust used as collateral for financial warranties; and

Any financial warranty completed before July 1, 1993, if the value of any such financial warranty includes any mineral value or if mineral value is used to update any such financial warranty. The value of any financial warranty described in this sub-subparagraph (B) shall include mineral value for the life of the warranty.

Any instrument offered as a financial warranty pursuant to this subsection (3) shall provide that the board may recover any necessary costs, including attorney fees, it incurs in foreclosing on or realizing any collateral used to secure such financial warranty if such financial warranty is forfeited.

Proof of financial responsibility may consist of any one or more of the following, subject to approval by the board:

A surety bond issued by a corporate surety authorized to do business in this state;

A letter of credit issued by a bank authorized to do business in the United States;

A certificate of deposit;

A deed of trust or security agreement encumbering real or personal property and creating a first lien in favor of the state;

Assurance, in such form as the board may require, that:

Upon commencement of production, the operator will establish an individual reclamation fund, to be held by an independent trustee for the board, upon such terms and conditions as the board may prescribe, which trust fund shall be funded by periodic cash payments representing such fraction of receipts as will, in the opinion of the board, provide assurance that funds will be available for reclamation;

Prior to issuance of a permit, the operator will provide another form of financial warranty as described in this paragraph (f). As the reclamation fund increases in value, the other form of financial warranty may be decreased in value so long as the sum of financial warranties is that amount specified by subsection (4) of this section.

Project-related fixtures and equipment (excluding rolling stock) owned or to be owned by the financial warrantor within the permit area will have a salvage value at least equal to the amount of the financial warranty, or the appropriate portion thereof;

Existing liens and encumbrances applicable to said fixtures and equipment, other than liens in favor of the United States or this state, any other state, and any political subdivisions, will be subordinated to the lien described in section 34-32-118 (4)(b); and

Said fixtures and equipment will be maintained in good operating condition and will not be removed from the permit area without the prior consent of the board;

and (VII) Repealed.

(VIII) Proof that the operator is a department or division of state government or a unit of county or municipal government.

Any proof of financial responsibility submitted or revised on or after July 1, 1993, shall be in compliance with paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection (4) of this section.

The board shall prescribe the amount and duration of financial warranties, taking into account the nature, extent, and duration of the proposed mining operation and the magnitude, type, and estimated cost of planned reclamation.

In any single year during the life of a permit, the amount of required financial warranties must not exceed the estimated cost of fully reclaiming all lands to be affected in said year, plus all lands affected in previous permit years and not yet fully reclaimed. For the purpose of this subsection (4)(b)(I), reclamation costs shall be computed with reference to current reclamation costs. The amount of the financial warranty must be sufficient to assure the completion of reclamation of affected lands if the office has to complete the reclamation due to forfeiture, including all measures commenced or reasonably foreseen to assure the protection of water resources, including costs necessary to cover water quality protection, treatment, and monitoring as may be required by permit. The financial warranty must include an additional amount equal to five percent of the amount of the financial warranty to defray the administrative costs incurred by the office in conducting the reclamation.

The office and the board shall take reasonable measures to assure the continued adequacy of any financial warranty.

The board may:

From time to time for good cause shown, increase or decrease the amount and duration of required financial warranties;

By rule or permit condition require proof of value on a periodic basis of all or any group of warranties held by the board; and

By rule or permit condition limit certain types of warranties to specific purposes only or require a designated percentage of the total bond be held in easily valued and convertible instruments.

A financial warrantor shall have sixty days after the date of notice of any such adjustment to fulfill all new requirements.

An operator may file a written notice of completion with the office whenever such operator believes such operator has completed any or all requirements of this article with respect to any or all of such operator's affected lands except for any such lands in designated mining operations. The office shall, within sixty days after receiving said notice, or as soon thereafter as weather conditions permit, inspect lands and reclamation described in the notice to determine if the operator has complied with all applicable requirements.

If the board or office finds that the operator has successfully complied with any or all requirements of this article, it shall release all performance and financial warranties applicable to said requirements. Releases shall be in writing and shall be delivered to the owner or operator promptly after the date of such finding.

If the board or office finds that the operator has not complied with applicable requirements of this article, it shall so advise the operator not more than sixty days after the date of the inspection.

If the office fails to conduct an inspection within the time specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) or fails to advise the operator of deficiencies within the time specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection (5), then all financial warranties applicable to reclamation described in the notice shall be deemed released as a matter of law.

(5.5) (a) (I) An operator may file a written notice of completion with the office upon completion of all requirements of this article with respect to any or all of such operator's affected lands at a designated mining operation.

The office shall inspect lands and reclamation described in any such written notice to determine if the operator has complied with all applicable requirements within sixty days after receiving such notice or as soon thereafter as weather conditions permit.

If the board or office finds that the operator has complied with all requirements of this article, it shall promptly deliver a written release of any performance and financial warranties, or portion thereof, to the owner or operator according to the following schedule:

An appropriate amount of the financial warranty for the applicable permit area shall be released when the operator completes the requirements of the approved reclamation plan; and

The performance warranty and the remaining portion of the financial warranty shall be released on such schedule as the board may prescribe; except that all remaining portions of the warranty shall be released at the end of the period described in paragraph (e) of this subsection (5.5) if, at that time, the affected land has been reclaimed for a beneficial use and is in compliance with all applicable performance standards.

If the board or office finds that the operator has not complied with applicable requirements of this article, it shall so advise the operator not more than sixty days after the date of an inspection conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) or (e) of this subsection (5.5).

If the operator is not entitled to a release of the financial warranty, or portion thereof, pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (5.5), the board or office may specify a reclamation schedule and adjust the amount of the financial warranty pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection (4) of this section.

If the office fails to conduct an inspection within the time specified in paragraph (a) or (e) of this subsection (5.5) or fails to advise the operator of any deficiencies within the time specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection (5.5), then that portion of the financial warranties applicable to reclamation described in the notice or request for release shall be deemed released as a matter of law.

At such time as the board or office may prescribe, but no more than five years after the release of a portion of the financial warranty as described in subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (5.5), the operator may file a written request for release of the performance warranty and the remaining portion of the financial warranty. The office shall inspect any lands and reclamation described in the request within sixty days after receiving such request or as soon thereafter as weather conditions permit to determine whether the affected land has been reclaimed for a beneficial use and is in compliance with all applicable performance standards.

Financial warranties shall be maintained in good standing for the entire life of any permit issued under this article. Financial warrantors shall immediately notify the board of any event which may impair their warranties.

Each financial warrantor providing proof of financial responsibility in a form described in subsection (3)(f)(IV), (3)(f)(V), or (8) of this section shall annually cause to be filed with the board a certification by an independent auditor that, as of the close of the financial warrantor's most recent fiscal year, the financial warrantor continued to meet all applicable requirements of the applicable subsection. Financial warrantors that no longer meet the requirements shall instead cause to be filed an alternate form of financial warranty.

Repealed.

Each financial warrantor providing proof of financial responsibility in a form described in subsection (3)(f)(IV), (3)(f)(V), or (8) of this section shall notify the board within sixty days of any net loss incurred in any quarterly period.

Whenever the board receives a notice under paragraph (a) or (c) of this subsection (6), fails to receive a certification or substitute warranty as required by paragraph (b) of this subsection (6), or otherwise has reason to believe that a financial warranty has been materially impaired, it may convene a hearing for the purpose of determining whether impairment has in fact occurred.

Whenever the board elects to convene a hearing pursuant to this subsection (6), it may hire an independent consultant to provide expert advice at the hearing. The fees of any such consultant shall be paid by the financial warrantor, and no consultant shall be hired until the financial warrantor signs a written fee agreement in such form as the board may prescribe. In the event that a financial warrantor refuses to sign such an agreement, the board may, without hearing, order the financial warrantor to provide an alternate form of financial warranty.

At any hearing held pursuant to this subsection (6), if the board finds that a financial warranty has been materially impaired, it may order the financial warrantor to provide an alternate form of financial warranty.

A financial warrantor shall have ninety days to provide any alternate warranty required under this subsection (6).

All hearings held under this subsection (6) shall comply with all requirements of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 1184, § 10, effective July 1, 1993.)

Repealed.

The board or office may, in its discretion, accept a first priority lien in the amount of the financial warranty prescribed pursuant to subsection (4) of this section on any project-related fixtures and equipment that must remain on-site in order for the reclamation plan to be performed in lieu of including the cost of acquiring and installing such fixtures and equipment.

The board or office may accept a first priority lien on any project-related fixtures and equipment that must be demolished or removed from the site under the reclamation plan. The board or office may, in its discretion, accept such a lien as a portion of the proof of financial responsibility if the amount credited for such lien does not exceed the cost of demolishing and removing the subject fixtures and equipment or the market value of such fixtures and equipment, whichever is less.

Any fixtures and equipment accepted pursuant to this subsection (8) shall be insured and maintained in good operating condition and shall not be removed from the permit area without the prior consent of the board. Each financial warrantor providing a lien on such equipment and fixtures shall file an annual report with the office in sufficient detail to fully describe the condition, value, and location of all pledged fixtures and equipment. Such financial warrantor shall not pledge such equipment and fixtures to secure any other obligation and shall immediately notify the office of any other interest that arises in the pledged property.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 742, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (2), (3), and (6) amended, p. 1562, § 2, effective June 2.

L. 79:

(1)(e) added, p. 1252, § 4, effective May 25.

L. 81:

(1)(e) amended, p. 1678, § 4, effective April 30; entire section R&RE, p. 1670, § 9, effective June 19.

L. 91:

(3)(a)(IX) amended, p. 757, § 33, effective April 4.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1184, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(3)(f)(VI) and (3)(f)(VII) repealed and (4)(b)(I) and (6)(b) amended, (HB 19-1113), ch. 73, p. 267, § 2, effective August 2; (6)(c) amended, (HB 19-1113), ch. 73, p. 267, § 2, effective August 2, 2020.

L. 2022:

(7) repealed, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2983, § 77, effective August 10.

34-32-118. Forfeiture of financial warranties.

A financial warranty shall be subject to forfeiture whenever the board shall determine that any one or more of the following circumstances exist:

The operator has violated a cease-and-desist order entered pursuant to section 34-32-124 and, if corrective action was proposed in such order, has failed to complete such corrective action although ample time to have done so has elapsed; or

The operator is in default under his performance warranty and has failed to cure such default although he has been given written notice thereof and has had ample time to cure such default; or

The financial warrantor has failed to maintain his financial warranty in good standing as required by section 34-32-117; or

The financial warrantor no longer has the financial ability to carry out his obligations under this article.

Whenever the board, based on information and belief, has reason to believe that a financial warranty is subject to forfeiture, the board shall so notify the operator and all financial warrantors. The board shall afford the operator and all financial warrantors the right to appear before the board at a hearing to be held not less than thirty days after the parties' receipt of said notice. Any such hearing shall be held in accordance with the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

At any such hearing, the board shall be empowered to:

Withdraw or modify any determination that the financial warranty is subject to forfeiture;

Settle or compromise the determination; or

Confirm its determination that the financial warranty should be forfeited.

Upon finding that a financial warranty should be forfeited, the board shall issue written findings of fact and conclusions of law to support its decision and shall issue an order directing affected financial warrantors to immediately deliver to the board all amounts warranted by applicable financial warranties.

The board, upon issuing any order pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, may request the attorney general to institute proceedings to secure or recover amounts warranted by forfeited financial warranties. The attorney general shall have the power, inter alia, to:

Foreclose upon any real and personal property encumbered for the benefit of the state;

Collect, present for payment, take possession of, and otherwise reduce to cash any property held as security by the board;

Dispose of pledged property.

The amount of any forfeited financial warranty shall be a lien in favor of this state upon any project-related fixtures or equipment offered as proof of financial responsibility pursuant to section 34-32-117 (3)(f)(V).

Said lien shall have priority over all other liens and encumbrances irrespective of the date of recordation, except liens of record on June 19, 1981, and liens of the United States, the state, and political subdivisions thereof for unpaid taxes, and shall attach and be deemed perfected as of the date the board approves issuance of the operator's permit.

Funds recovered by the attorney general in proceedings brought pursuant to subsection (4) of this section shall be held in the account described in section 34-32-122 and shall be used to reclaim lands covered by the forfeited warranties; except that five percent of the amount of the financial warranty shall be deposited in the mined land reclamation fund, created in section 34-32-127, to cover the administrative costs incurred by the office in performing reclamation. The board shall have a right of entry to reclaim said lands. Upon completion of such reclamation, the board shall present to the financial warrantor a full accounting and shall refund all unspent moneys.

Defaulting operators shall remain liable for the actual cost of reclaiming affected lands, less any amounts expended by the board pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, notwithstanding any discharge of applicable financial warranties.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a corporate surety may elect to reclaim affected lands in accordance with an approved plan in lieu of forfeiting a bond penalty.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 743, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1564, § 3, effective June 2.

L. 81:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1674, § 10, effective June 19.

L. 93:

(5) amended, p. 1193, § 11, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-32-113 as it existed prior to 1976.

34-32-119. Operators - succession.

Where one operator succeeds another at any uncompleted operation, the board shall release the first operator from all liability as to that particular reclamation operation and shall release all applicable performance and financial warranties as to such operation if the successor operator assumes, as part of his obligation under this article, all liability for the reclamation of the affected land, and his obligation is covered by appropriate performance and financial warranties as to such affected land. Where one operator succeeds another, a fee as specified in section 34-32-127 (2) shall be paid to the board before the first operator is released from liability and before any financial warranties are released.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 743, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1676, § 11, effective June 19.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1435, § 10, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-32-114 as it existed prior to 1976.

34-32-120. Permit refused defaulting operator.

No permit for new mining operations shall be granted to any operator who is currently found to be in violation of the provisions of this article with respect to any operation in this state.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 744, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-32-115 as it existed prior to 1976.

34-32-121. Entry upon lands for inspection.

The board, the office, or their authorized representatives may enter upon the lands of the operator at all reasonable times for the purpose of inspection to determine whether the provisions of this article have been complied with.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 744, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1943, § 42, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-32-116 as it existed prior to 1976.

34-32-121.5. Reporting certain conditions.

Any person engaged in a mining operation shall notify the office of any failure or imminent failure as soon as reasonably practicable after such person has knowledge of such condition, but for in situ leach mining operations in no event more than twenty-four hours after the discovery of such failure or an imminent failure, of: Any impoundment, embankment, or slope that poses a reasonable potential for danger to any persons or property or to the environment; any structure for in situ leach mining operations designed to detect, prevent, minimize, or mitigate adverse impacts on groundwater; any structure used in connection with in situ leach mining designed to detect, prevent, minimize, or mitigate adverse impacts on human health, wildlife, or the environment; or any environmental protection facility designed to contain or control chemicals or waste that are acid- or toxic-forming, as identified in the permit.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1193, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 941, § 8, effective May 20.

34-32-122. Fees, civil penalties, and forfeitures - deposit - emergency response cash fund - created - definition.

All fees and assessments collected pursuant to this article and five percent of the proceeds of any financial warranty forfeited pursuant to section 34-32-118 shall be deposited in the mined land reclamation fund for administrative costs associated with reclaiming sites for which the financial warranty has been revoked. All civil penalties collected under the provisions of this article shall be deposited in the general fund. Ninety-five percent of the proceeds of all financial warranties forfeited under the provisions of section 34-32-118 shall be deposited in a special account in the general fund established by the board for the purposes of reclaiming lands which were obligated to be reclaimed under the permits upon which such financial warranties have been forfeited.

Repealed.

(1.5) Repealed.

Any applicant that desires to utilize the self-insurance provisions listed in section 34-32-117 (3)(f)(IV), (3)(f)(V), or (8) shall pay an annual fee to the office sufficient to defray the actual cost to the office of establishing and reviewing the financial warranty of the applicant. These funds are hereby annually made available to the office, which shall utilize outside financial and legal services for this purpose.

The board is hereby authorized to accept grants and donations for the purposes of responding to emergencies as set forth in this subsection (3). All grants and donations accepted pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer who shall credit the same to the emergency response cash fund, which fund is hereby created.
(3) (a) (I) The board is hereby authorized to accept grants and donations for the purposes of responding to emergencies as set forth in this subsection (3). All grants and donations accepted pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer who shall credit the same to the emergency response cash fund, which fund is hereby created.

The emergency response cash fund may be used by the executive director to conduct emergency responses or to perform emergency reclamation activities at mining operations subject to this article and as specified in section 34-32-124.5 (1)(b).

An amount equal to the civil penalties collected pursuant to section 34-32-123 shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly for purposes of responding to emergencies as set forth in this subsection (3), if the general assembly determines that funds in the emergency response cash fund are inadequate to adequately respond to an emergency.

Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (3) to the contrary, on July 1, 2003, the state treasurer shall deduct four hundred eighty-six thousand six hundred thirteen dollars from the emergency response cash fund and transfer such sum to the general fund.

"Emergency" means any event to which the board is authorized to respond pursuant to section 34-32-124.5.

The executive director is authorized to bring an action in the district court against any owner, operator, or permit holder whose actions the executive director reasonably believes necessitated the emergency response or caused the emergency. The purpose of any such action shall be to recover the funds expended from the emergency response cash fund from such owner, operator, or permit holder.

The burden of proof in any action brought pursuant to this paragraph (c) shall be on the state, which shall demonstrate with competent evidence that:

An emergency existed;

The parties named necessitated the emergency response or caused the emergency; and

The response was reasonable under the circumstances known or reasonably thought to exist by the state.

Nothing in this paragraph (c) shall be construed to prevent a named party from challenging the adequacy of the evidence or from presenting contrary evidence.

If there is a conflict regarding costs incurred by the office pursuant to this subsection (3), the state shall bear the burden of proof.

The court may apportion responsibility for any award of reasonable emergency response costs to any party or parties in any proportion as may be equitable under the circumstances; except that liability shall be several and individual and not joint and collective.

If the board makes findings pursuant to section 34-32-124.5 which justify an emergency response, it may:

Establish an emergency response team;

Enter the property and take remedial action necessary to bring the operation into compliance with the permit or remove an imminent threat to the public health and safety;

Issue a written cease-and-desist order requiring any party to immediately discontinue an activity; and

Apply to the district court for the district in which the activity is occurring for a temporary restraining order, temporary injunction, or permanent injunction.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to qualify the authority of the executive director or to prevent the executive director from taking action pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 744, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 690, § 1, effective April 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1676, § 12, effective June 19.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 1841, § 2, effective August 27.

L. 88:

(1)(a) amended and (1)(b) repealed, pp. 1214, 1215, §§ 12, 16, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1435, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2) amended, p. 1943, § 43, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1193, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3)(a)(IV) added, p. 1544, § 6, effective May 1.

L. 2016:

(3)(a)(II) amended, (HB 16-1276), ch. 165, p. 526, § 1, effective May 17.

L. 2018:

(1)(c) and (1.5) added, (HB 18-1338), ch. 201, pp. 1310, 1309, §§ 10, 6, effective May 4.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (HB 19-1113), ch. 73, p. 269, § 3, effective August 2.

34-32-123. Operating without a permit - penalty.

Whenever an operator or prospector fails to obtain a valid permit or file a notice of intent under the provisions of this article, the board or the office may issue an immediate cease-and-desist order. Concurrently with the issuance of such an order, the board or the office may seek a restraining order or injunction pursuant to section 34-32-124 (3).

Any operator who operates without a permit shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than one thousand dollars per day nor more than five thousand dollars per day for each day the land has been affected. Such penalties shall be assessed for a period not to exceed sixty days. Operators who mine substantial acreage beyond their approved permit boundary may be found to be operating without a permit.

Any operator or prospector who operates without filing a notice of intent or a permit under section 34-32-110 shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars nor more than two hundred dollars per day for each day the land has been affected. Such penalties shall be assessed for not less than one day and not more than sixty days. Operators operating under a permit approved pursuant to section 34-32-110 who affect more than two acres may be found to be operating without a permit.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 744, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(2) amended and (3) added, p. 1214, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 1422, § 5, effective May 6.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 1943, § 44, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 34-32-113 and 34-32-117 as they existed prior to 1976.

34-32-124. Failure to comply with conditions of order, permit, or regulation.

Whenever the board or the office has reason to believe that there has occurred a violation of an order, permit, notice of intent, or regulation issued under the authority of this article, written notice shall be given to the operator or prospector of the alleged violation. Such notice shall be served personally or by certified mail, return receipt requested, upon the alleged violator or the alleged violator's agent for service of process. The notice shall state the provision alleged to be violated and the facts alleged to constitute the violation and may include the nature of any corrective action proposed to be required.

If the board determines that there exists any violation of any provisions of this article or of any notice, permit, or regulation issued or promulgated under authority of this article, the board may issue a cease-and-desist order. Such order shall set forth the provisions alleged to be violated, the facts alleged to constitute the violation, and the time by which the acts or practices complained of must be terminated and may include the nature of any corrective action proposed to be required. Such order shall be served personally or by certified mail, return receipt requested, upon the alleged violator or the violator's agent for service of process.

Any costs incurred by the board or office in carrying out corrective action pursuant to this section may be assessed against the violator. The board may also assess additional costs against the violator for any inordinate expenditure of board or office resources necessitated by the administration of such corrective action.

In the event any operator fails to comply with a cease-and-desist order issued by the board, the board or the office may request the attorney general to bring suit for a temporary restraining order, a preliminary injunction, or a permanent injunction to prevent any further or continued violation of such order. Suits under this section shall be brought in the district court where the alleged violation occurs. If the board or the office determines that the situation is an emergency, the emergency shall be given precedence over all other matters pending in such court.

The board or the office may require the alleged violator to appear before the board no sooner than twenty days after the issuance of such cease-and-desist order; except that an earlier date for hearing may be requested by the alleged violator.

If a hearing is held pursuant to the provisions of this section, it shall be open to the public and conducted in accordance with the provisions of the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. The board shall permit all parties to respond to the notice served, to present evidence and arguments on all issues, and to conduct cross-examination required for a full disclosure of the facts.

Upon a determination, after hearing, that a violation of a permit provision has occurred, the board may suspend, modify, or revoke the pertinent permit.

If the board suspends or revokes the permit of an operator, the operator may continue mining operations only for the purpose of bringing the mining operation into satisfactory compliance with the provisions of the operator's permit. Once such operations are completed to the satisfaction of the board, the board shall reinstate the permit of the operator.

Any person who violates any provision of any permit issued under this article shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars per day nor more than one thousand dollars per day for each day during which such violation occurs; except that any operator who operates under a permit issued under section 34-32-110 shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars nor more than two hundred dollars per day for each day during which such violation occurs.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 744, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1422, § 6, effective May 6.

L. 92:

(1), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1943, § 45, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1195, § 14, effective July 1.

34-32-124.5. Emergencies endangering public health or environment - definition.

Following an investigation, an emergency response is justified pursuant to section 34-32-122 (3) if the board or office determines that:

Any person is:

Engaging in any activity not sanctioned by, or that constitutes a material violation of, a permit for a mining operation if such activity constitutes an immediate, undue, and unwarranted risk of serious harm to persons or property or to the environment;

An operator with a permit who is failing or refusing to respond to a board order requiring corrective actions for any failure or imminent failure of:

Any impoundment, embankment, or slope identified in the permit;

Any environmental protection facility or measure identified in the permit that is designed for control or containment of chemicals or waste that are toxic, toxic-forming, or acid; or

Any other measure identified in the permit or as provided for in this article or any rule promulgated pursuant to this article that is intended to protect human health or property or the environment; or

Circumstances exist, regardless of whether caused by a person, at a legacy mine site that create a danger to public health or welfare or the environment. For purposes of this paragraph (b), "legacy mine site" means a site where hard rock mining operations have been abandoned as those terms are defined in section 34-34-101 (1)(b) and (4).

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1196, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1276), ch. 165, p. 526, § 2, effective May 17.

34-32-125. Conflict with "Colorado Surface Coal Mining Reclamation Act".

Nothing in this article shall apply to any mining operation regarding reclamation of mined land which is regulated by the board or office pursuant to article 33 of this title.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire section added, p. 1306, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1944, § 46, effective July 1.

34-32-126. Fees - mined land reclamation cash fund. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1841, § 1, effective August 27.

L. 88:

Entire section repealed, p. 1215, § 16, effective July 1.